Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.380

Application—Additional information required.

In addition to the information expressly required to be included in any application under this chapter, there shall be added such further material information, if any, as may be necessary to make the required statements, in the light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading.

[ 1981 c 85 s 75.]